Nebraska, session 109, LB147.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB147 LB147
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-3306, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-3306 Any public or private entity not included in section 71-3305
which provides a water supply for human consumption and which is not
required to add fluoride to such water supply may add fluoride to such
water supply in the amount and manner prescribed by the rules and
regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-3306, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. The following section is outright repealed: Section
71-3305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-2-